District of Columbia statutes.
2-603

Statutes-at-Large.

(a)

Beginning in 2013, within 45 days of the end of each Council year, the Council shall compile and publish online the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large which shall include in separate chronological order:

(1)

Council acts, including emergency acts adopted after December 31, 1986, which become law during that Council year; and

(2)

Council resolutions adopted during that Council year, except ceremonial resolutions adopted after December 31, 1986.

(b)

The 1st publication of the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large shall also contain in a separate part each regulation and resolution of the District of Columbia Council in chronological order.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

The District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large shall contain a certificate by the General Counsel to the Council of the District of Columbia stating that it contains all the documents required to be published pursuant to this section as of the date of the certificate.

History

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-19, title II, § 205, 22 DCR 2062
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 6(c), 25 DCR 6960
Feb. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-78, § 2, 34 DCR 7956
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1112, 59 DCR 8025

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1603.
1973 Ed., § 1-1603.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168, in the introductory language of (a), added “Beginning in 2013,” substituted “the Council” for “the Mayor,” and substituted “publish online” for “publish”; repealed (c), which read: “The Mayor shall make copies of the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large available to the public at a reasonable cost calculated to cover the costs of its compilation, publication, and distribution”; and added (d).